en: Cheeseburgers
xx: Cheeseburgers
de: Cheeseburger
fi: juustohampurilainen
fr: Cheeseburgers, cheese-burgers
ja: チーズバーガー
nl: Cheeseburgers
ru: Чизбургер

en: Cheeseburgers from fast food restaurants
es: Hamburguesas de queso de restaurantes de comida rápida
fr: Cheeseburgers de fast food
hr: Cheeseburgeri iz restorana brze hrane
ja: ファストフードレストランのチーズバーガー
nl: Cheeseburgers van fastfoodrestaurants

en: Double cheeseburgers
de: Doppel-Cheeseburger
es: Hamburguesas dobles con queso
fr: Double cheeseburgers
hr: Dupli čizburgeri
ja: ダブルチーズバーガー
nl: Dubbele kaasburgers

en: Double cheeseburgers from fast food restaurants
fr: Double cheeseburgers de fast food

en: Pan bagnat, Large round sandwich with lettuce tuna anchovy and black olives
fr: Pan bagnat

en: Toasted ham sandwich topped with grated cheese and a fried egg
fr: Croque-madame, croquemadame

en: Toasted ham sandwich topped with grated cheese
el: Κροκ-μεσιέ
fr: Croque-monsieur, Croque-messieurs, croquemonsieur
hr: Tostirani sendvič sa šunkom preliven naribanim sirom

en: Grilled cheese & ham sandwich prepacked
fr: Croque-monsieur frais

en: Hamburgers, Burgers
bg: Хамбургери, Бургери
ca: Hamburgueses
de: Hamburger
el: Χάμπουργκερ
es: Hamburguesas
fi: Hampurilainen
fr: Hamburgers, Hamburger, Burger
hr: Hamburgeri
it: Hamburger
ja: ハンバーガー
nl: Hamburgers
ru: Гамбургер

en: Hamburgers from fast food
fr: Hamburgers de fast food

en: Chicken hamburgers, Chicken burger
de: Hühnchen-Hamburger, Hühnchen-Burger
es: Hamburguesas de pollo, Hamburguesa de pollo
fr: Hamburgers au poulet, Burger au poulet
hr: Pileći hamburgeri
it: Hamburger di pollo, Burger di pollo
nl: Kip hamburgers, Kip burger

en: Fish hamburgers, Fish burgers
bg: Рибени хамбургери, Рибени бургери, Бургери от риба, Бургери от треска
ca: Hamburgueses de peix, Hamburgueses del mar, Hamburgueses de bacallà
de: Fischburger, Fisch-Burger, Meeresburger, Kabeljau-Burger
el: Ψαρομπέργκερ, Ψαρομπέργκερ της θάλασσας, Ψαρομπέργκερ μπακαλιάρου
es: Hamburguesas de pescado, Hamburguesas del mar, Hamburguesas de bacalao
fi: Kala-hampurilaiset, Meren hampurilaiset, Turskahampurilaiset
fr: Hamburgers au poisson, Burgers au poisson, Burgers de la mer, Burgers de cabillaud
hr: Riblji hamburgeri
it: Hamburger di pesce, Hamburger di mare, Hamburger di merluzzo
ja: 魚のハンバーガー, 海のハンバーガー, タラのハンバーガー
nl: Visburgers, Zeeburgers, Kabeljauwburgers
ru: Рыбные гамбургеры, Рыбные бургеры, Бургеры из рыбы, Бургеры из трески

en: Vegetarian hamburgers, Veggie burgers
ca: Hamburgueses vegetals
de: Vegetarische Hamburger
es: Hamburguesas vegetales
fi: Kasvishampurilaiset
fr: Hamburgers végétariens, Hamburger végétarien, Hamburgers végétales, Hamburgers végétaux, Hamburger végétal
hr: Vegetarijanski hamburgeri
it: Hamburger vegetali
nl: Vegetarische hamburgers

en: Hot dog sandwiches
xx: Hot-dog
es: Perritos calientes, Hot dogs, Hot-dog
fr: Hot-dogs, Hot-dog
ja: ホットドッグ
nl: Hotdogs
pl: Hot-dogi

en: Vegetarian hot dog sandwiches
es: Perritos calientes vegetales, Perritos vegetales, Hot dog vegetales
fr: Hot-dogs végétariens, hot-dog végétal, hots-dogs végétaux, Hot-dog végétarien
hr: Vegetarijanski hot dog sendviči
nl: Vegetarische hotdogs
pl: Hot-dogi wegetariańskie, wegetariańskie hot-dogi

en: Sandwiches with ham and emmental cheese
de: Sandwiches mit Schinken und Emmentaler Käse
es: Bocadillos con jamón y queso emmental
fr: Sandwichs jambon-emmental
hr: Sendviči sa šunkom i ementalcem
it: Sandwiches con prosciutto e formaggio emmental
nl: Sandwiches met ham en emmentaler kaas

en: Sandwiches with ham and emmental cheese and butter
de: Sandwiches mit Schinken, Emmentaler Käse und Butter
es: Bocadillos con jamón, queso emmental y mantequilla
fr: Sandwichs jambon-emmental-beurre
hr: Sendviči sa šunkom i ementalcem i maslacem
it: Panini con prosciutto, formaggio emmental e burro
nl: Broodjes met ham, emmentaler kaas en boter

en: Baguette sandwich with merguez sausage
de: Baguette-Sandwich mit Merguez-Wurst
es: Bocadillo de baguette con salchicha merguez
fr: Sandwich baguette à la merguez
hr: Baguette sendvič s merguez kobasicom
it: Panino baguette con salsiccia merguez
nl: Stokbrood sandwich met merguez worst

en: Sandwich with egg and vegetables and mayonnaise
de: Sandwich mit Ei und Gemüse und Mayonnaise
es: Bocadillo de huevo y verduras con mayonesa
fr: Sandwich crudités-oeuf, Sandwich oeuf-crudités
hr: Sendvič s jajetom i povrćem te majonezom
it: Panino con uovo, verdure e maionese
nl: Broodje met ei, groenten en mayonaise

en: Reuben Sandwich
de: Reuben-Sandwich
es: Bocadillo Reuben
fr: Sandwich Reuben
hr: Reuben sendvič
it: Panino Reuben
ja: ルーベンサンドイッチ
ko: 루벤 샌드위치
nl: Reuben-sandwich
pl: Kanapka Reuben
pt: Sanduíche Reuben
ru: Сэндвич Рубен
zh: 卢宾三明治